Washington statutes.
RCW 10.77.025

Maximum term of commitment or treatment.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1359-S2.SL) ***

(1) Whenever any person has been: (a) Committed to a correctional facility or inpatient treatment under any provision of this chapter; or (b) ordered to undergo alternative treatment following his or her acquittal by reason of insanity of a crime charged, such commitment or treatment cannot exceed the maximum possible penal sentence for any offense charged for which the person was committed, or was acquitted by reason of insanity.

(2) Whenever any person committed under any provision of this chapter has not been released within seven days of the maximum possible penal sentence under subsection (1) of this section, and the professional person in charge of the facility believes that the person presents a likelihood of serious harm or is gravely disabled due to a mental disorder, the professional person shall, prior to the expiration of the maximum penal sentence, notify the appropriate designated crisis responder of the impending expiration and provide a copy of all relevant information regarding the person, including the likely release date and shall indicate why the person should not be released.

(3) A designated crisis responder who receives notice and records under subsection (2) of this section shall, prior to the date of the expiration of the maximum sentence, determine whether to initiate proceedings under chapter 71.05 RCW.

[ 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 406; 2000 c 94 s 13; 1998 c 297 s 31.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2016 sp.s. c 29: See note following RCW 71.05.760.

Short title—Right of action—2016 sp.s. c 29: See notes following RCW 71.05.010.

Effective dates—Severability—Intent—1998 c 297: See notes following RCW 71.05.010.